test/src/morphology/V-sooma_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Verb - sööma: # Verb 'to eat' - full paradigm
     # according to Eesti keele käsiraamat
     # http://www.eki.ee/books/ekk09/
     # -----------------------------------------
     # indicative mood
     # present tense
     #
     sööma+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: söön
     sööma+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: sööd
     sööma+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sööb
     sööma+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: sööme
     sööma+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: sööte
     sööma+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: söövad
     sööma+V+Ind+Prs+4: süüakse
     sööma+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1+ConNeg: söö
     sööma+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2+ConNeg: söö
     sööma+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3+ConNeg: söö
     sööma+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1+ConNeg: söö
     sööma+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2+ConNeg: söö
     sööma+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3+ConNeg: söö
     sööma+V+Ind+Prs+4+ConNeg: sööda
     # indicative mood
     # past tense
     #
     sööma+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: sõin
     sööma+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: sõid
     sööma+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: sõi
     sööma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: sõime
     sööma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: sõite
     sööma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: sõid
     sööma+V+Ind+Prt+4: söödi
     sööma+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1+ConNeg: söönud
     sööma+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2+ConNeg: söönud
     sööma+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3+ConNeg: söönud
     sööma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1+ConNeg: söönud
     sööma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2+ConNeg: söönud
     sööma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3+ConNeg: söönud
     sööma+V+Ind+Prt+4+ConNeg: söödud
     # conditional mood
     # present tense
     #
     sööma+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: sööksin
     sööma+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: sööksid
     sööma+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: sööks
     sööma+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: sööksime
     sööma+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: sööksite
     sööma+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: sööksid
     sööma+V+Cond+Prs+4: söödaks
     sööma+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1+ConNeg: sööks
     sööma+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2+ConNeg: sööks
     sööma+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3+ConNeg: sööks
     sööma+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1+ConNeg: sööks
     sööma+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2+ConNeg: sööks
     sööma+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3+ConNeg: sööks
     sööma+V+Cond+Prs+4+ConNeg: söödaks
     # conditional mood
     # past tense
     #
     sööma+V+Cond+Prt+Sg1: söönuksin
     sööma+V+Cond+Prt+Sg2: söönuksid
     sööma+V+Cond+Prt+Sg3: söönuks
     sööma+V+Cond+Prt+Pl1: söönuksime
     sööma+V+Cond+Prt+Pl2: söönuksite
     sööma+V+Cond+Prt+Pl3: söönuksid
     sööma+V+Cond+Prt+4: sööduks
     sööma+V+Cond+Prt+Sg1+ConNeg: söönuks
     sööma+V+Cond+Prt+Sg2+ConNeg: söönuks
     sööma+V+Cond+Prt+Sg3+ConNeg: söönuks
     sööma+V+Cond+Prt+Pl1+ConNeg: söönuks
     sööma+V+Cond+Prt+Pl2+ConNeg: söönuks
     sööma+V+Cond+Prt+Pl3+ConNeg: söönuks
     sööma+V+Cond+Prt+4+ConNeg: sööduks
     # imperative mood
     #
     sööma+V+Imprt+Sg2: söö
     sööma+V+Imprt+Sg3: söögu
     sööma+V+Imprt+Pl1: söögem
     sööma+V+Imprt+Pl2: sööge
     sööma+V+Imprt+Pl3: söögu
     sööma+V+Imprt+4: söödagu
     sööma+V+Imprt+Sg2+ConNeg: söö
     sööma+V+Imprt+Sg3+ConNeg: söögu
     sööma+V+Imprt+Pl1+ConNeg: söögem
     sööma+V+Imprt+Pl2+ConNeg: sööge
     sööma+V+Imprt+Pl3+ConNeg: söögu
     sööma+V+Imprt+4+ConNeg: söödagu
     # oblique mood (quotative)
     # present tense
     #
     sööma+V+Quo+Prs+Sg1: söövat
     sööma+V+Quo+Prs+Sg2: söövat
     sööma+V+Quo+Prs+Sg3: söövat
     sööma+V+Quo+Prs+Pl1: söövat
     sööma+V+Quo+Prs+Pl2: söövat
     sööma+V+Quo+Prs+Pl3: söövat
     sööma+V+Quo+Prs+4: söödavat
     sööma+V+Quo+Prs+Sg1+ConNeg: söövat
     sööma+V+Quo+Prs+Sg2+ConNeg: söövat
     sööma+V+Quo+Prs+Sg3+ConNeg: söövat
     sööma+V+Quo+Prs+Pl1+ConNeg: söövat
     sööma+V+Quo+Prs+Pl2+ConNeg: söövat
     sööma+V+Quo+Prs+Pl3+ConNeg: söövat
     sööma+V+Quo+Prs+4+ConNeg: söödavat
     # oblique mood (quotative)
     # past tense
     #
     sööma+V+Quo+Prt+Sg1: söönuvat
     sööma+V+Quo+Prt+Sg2: söönuvat
     sööma+V+Quo+Prt+Sg3: söönuvat
     sööma+V+Quo+Prt+Pl1: söönuvat
     sööma+V+Quo+Prt+Pl2: söönuvat
     sööma+V+Quo+Prt+Pl3: söönuvat
     sööma+V+Quo+Prt+4: söödanuvat
     sööma+V+Quo+Prt+Sg1+ConNeg: söönuvat
     sööma+V+Quo+Prt+Sg2+ConNeg: söönuvat
     sööma+V+Quo+Prt+Sg3+ConNeg: söönuvat
     sööma+V+Quo+Prt+Pl1+ConNeg: söönuvat
     sööma+V+Quo+Prt+Pl2+ConNeg: söönuvat
     sööma+V+Quo+Prt+Pl3+ConNeg: söönuvat
     sööma+V+Quo+Prt+4+ConNeg: söödanuvat
     # jussive mood
     # present tense
     #
     sööma+V+Jus+Prs+Sg1: söögu
     sööma+V+Jus+Prs+Sg2: söögu
     sööma+V+Jus+Prs+Sg3: söögu
     sööma+V+Jus+Prs+Pl1: söögu
     sööma+V+Jus+Prs+Pl2: söögu
     sööma+V+Jus+Prs+Pl3: söögu
     sööma+V+Jus+Prs+4: söödagu
     sööma+V+Jus+Prs+Sg1+ConNeg: söögu
     sööma+V+Jus+Prs+Sg2+ConNeg: söögu
     sööma+V+Jus+Prs+Sg3+ConNeg: söögu
     sööma+V+Jus+Prs+Pl1+ConNeg: söögu
     sööma+V+Jus+Prs+Pl2+ConNeg: söögu
     sööma+V+Jus+Prs+Pl3+ConNeg: söögu
     sööma+V+Jus+Prs+4+ConNeg: söödagu
     # jussive mood
     # past tense
     #
     sööma+V+Jus+Prt+Sg1: söönud
     sööma+V+Jus+Prt+Sg2: söönud
     sööma+V+Jus+Prt+Sg3: söönud
     sööma+V+Jus+Prt+Pl1: söönud
     sööma+V+Jus+Prt+Pl2: söönud
     sööma+V+Jus+Prt+Pl3: söönud
     sööma+V+Jus+Prt+4: söödud
     sööma+V+Jus+Prt+Sg1+ConNeg: söönud
     sööma+V+Jus+Prt+Sg2+ConNeg: söönud
     sööma+V+Jus+Prt+Sg3+ConNeg: söönud
     sööma+V+Jus+Prt+Pl1+ConNeg: söönud
     sööma+V+Jus+Prt+Pl2+ConNeg: söönud
     sööma+V+Jus+Prt+Pl3+ConNeg: söönud
     sööma+V+Jus+Prt+4+ConNeg: söödud
     #
     # Infinitive
     #
     sööma+V+Inf: süüa
     #
     # Supine
     #
     sööma+V+Sup: sööma
     sööma+V+Sup+Ill: sööma
     sööma+V+Sup+Ine: söömas
     sööma+V+Sup+Ela: söömast
     sööma+V+Sup+Tra: söömaks
     sööma+V+Sup+VAbess: söömata
     # ? sööma+V+Sup+4: söödama     
     #
     # Participle
     #
     sööma+V+PrsPrc: sööv
     sööma+V+PrsPrc+4: söödav
     sööma+V+PrfPrc: söönud
     sööma+V+PrfPrc+4: söödud
     #
     # Gerund
     #
     sööma+V+Ger: süües


# The verb forms list should be complete now
